Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Medical Practice

§ 1351.
Board of Medical Practice.

The Board of Medical Practice is created. The Board shall be composed of 17 members, nine of whom shall be licensed physicians, one of whom shall be a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 31 of this title, one of whom shall be a podiatrist licensed pursuant to chapter 7 of this title, and six of whom shall be persons not associated with the medical field. The Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint the members of the Board. Appointments shall be for a term of five years, except that a vacancy occurring during a term shall be filled by an appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term. No member shall be appointed to more than two consecutive full terms, but a member appointed for less than a full term, originally or to fill a vacancy, may serve two full terms in addition to such part of a full term, and a former member shall again be eligible for appointment after a lapse of one or more years. Any member of the Board may be removed by the Governor at any time. The Board shall elect from its members a chair, vice chair, and secretary who shall serve for one year and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The Board shall meet upon the call of the Chair or the Commissioner of Health, or at such other times and places as the Board may determine. Except as otherwise provided in sections 1372, 1373, and 1374 of this title, nine members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of the majority of the members present and voting shall be required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, to pass any measure, or to authorize any decision or order of the Board.

In the performance of their duties, members of the Board shall be paid a per diem and their actual and necessary expenses as provided by

32 V.S.A. § 1010(b)

.

The Board of Medical Practice is established as an office within the Department of Health. With respect to the Board, the Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties to:

Appoint a director of the office.

Employ or contract for legal counsel and such assistants as may be required, to fix the compensation to be paid for these services, and to incur such other expenses as the Commissioner determines are necessary.

Employ, contract, or make arrangements for the performance of administrative, investigative, and similar services required or appropriate in the performance of the duties of the Board.

Act as custodian of the records of the Board.

Prepare an annual budget and administer money appropriated to the Board by the General Assembly. The budget of the Board shall be part of the budget of the Department. A Board of Medical Practice Regulatory Fee Fund is created. All Board regulatory fees received by the Department shall be deposited into this Fund and used to offset up to two years of the costs incurred by the Board, and shall not be used for any purpose other than professional regulation and responsibilities of the Board, as determined by the Commissioner of Health. To ensure that revenues derived by the Department are adequate to offset the cost of regulation, the Commissioner shall review fees from time to time, and present proposed fee changes to the General Assembly.

Prepare and maintain a registry of all physicians licensed by the Board.

Make available an accounting of all fees and fines received by the Board and all expenditures and costs of the Board annually.

The Commissioner of Health shall appoint, and may terminate the employment of, the Director, administrative support staff, and any investigator or private legal counsel employed or retained by the Board.

The Commissioner of Health shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules of the Board that the Commissioner determines necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapters 7, 29, 31, and 52 of this title.

A classified State employee who is employed as an investigator by the Department of Health who is certified as a Level III law enforcement officer under 20 V.S.A. chapter 151 shall have the same powers as sheriffs in criminal matters and the enforcement of the law and in serving criminal process, and shall have all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs in a suit brought against him or her in consequence for acts done in the course of his or her employment.
(f) (1) A classified State employee who is employed as an investigator by the Department of Health who is certified as a Level III law enforcement officer under 20 V.S.A. chapter 151 shall have the same powers as sheriffs in criminal matters and the enforcement of the law and in serving criminal process, and shall have all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs in a suit brought against him or her in consequence for acts done in the course of his or her employment.

A Board of Medical Practice investigator employed by the Department of Health who is not certified as a Level III law enforcement officer under 20 V.S.A. chapter 151 shall annually obtain a minimum of 25 hours of training regarding the methods of conducting investigations of alleged unprofessional conduct, as approved by the Board.

Any Board of Medical Practice investigator employed by the Department of Health shall obtain as soon as practicable and thereafter maintain certification by a nationally or regionally recognized entity regarding the investigation of licensing cases, as approved by the Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 91

, § 1, eff. May 5, 1977;

1981, No. 100

, § 12;

1985, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. June 30, 1986;

1989, No. 102

, § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 92;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. June 13, 2002;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 34

, § 6, eff. May 23, 2003;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 117a;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 19d, eff. May 12, 2010;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2013, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. July 1, 2015;

2015, No. 2

, § 5, eff. March 12, 2015;

2015, No. 2

, § 6;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1352.
Repealed. 2011, No. 61, § 9, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 1353.
Powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall have the following powers and duties to:

License and certify health professionals pursuant to this title.

Investigate all complaints and charges of unprofessional conduct against any holder of a license or certificate, or any medical practitioner practicing pursuant to section 1313 of this title, and to hold hearings to determine whether such charges are substantiated or unsubstantiated. The Board may employ or contract with one or more hearing officers to schedule, oversee prehearing processes, preside over hearings, and assist with the preparation of reports and decisions.

Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any investigations, hearings, or disciplinary proceedings held under this chapter. Any individual or entity served with a subpoena issued by the Board shall comply notwithstanding the patient’s privilege established in

12 V.S.A. § 1612

.

Take or cause depositions to be taken as needed in any investigation, hearing, or proceeding.

Undertake any such other actions and procedures specified in, or required or appropriate to carry out, the provisions of this chapter and chapters 7, 29, 31, and 52 of this title.

Require a licensee or applicant to submit to a mental or physical examination, and an evaluation of medical knowledge and skill by individuals or entities designated by the Board if the Board has a reasonable basis to believe a licensee or applicant may be incompetent or unable to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety. The results of the examination or evaluation shall be admissible in any hearing before the Board. The results of an examination or evaluation obtained under this subsection and any information directly or indirectly derived from such examination or evaluation shall not be used for any purpose, including impeachment or cross-examination against the licensee or applicant in any criminal or civil case, except a prosecution for perjury or giving a false statement. The Board shall bear the cost of any examination or evaluation ordered and conducted pursuant to this subdivision in whole or in part if the licensee demonstrates financial hardship or other good cause. The licensee or applicant, at his or her expense, shall have the right to present the results or reports of independent examinations and evaluations for the Board’s due consideration. An order by the Board that a licensee or applicant submit to an examination, test, or evaluation shall be treated as a discovery order for the purposes of enforcement under

3 V.S.A. §§ 809a

and 809b. The results of an examination or evaluation obtained under this subdivision shall be confidential except as provided in this subdivision.

Investigate all complaints of illegal practice of medicine and refer any substantiated illegal practice of medicine to the Office of the Attorney General or the State’s Attorney in the county in which the violation occurred.

Inquire into the criminal history backgrounds of applicants for licensure and for biennial license renewal for all professionals licensed or certified by the Board. In obtaining these background checks, the Board may inquire directly of the Vermont Crime Information Center, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the National Crime Information Center, or other holders of official criminal record information, and may arrange for these inquiries to be made by a commercial service.
(8) (A) Inquire into the criminal history backgrounds of applicants for licensure and for biennial license renewal for all professionals licensed or certified by the Board. In obtaining these background checks, the Board may inquire directly of the Vermont Crime Information Center, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the National Crime Information Center, or other holders of official criminal record information, and may arrange for these inquiries to be made by a commercial service.

Prior to acting on an initial or renewal application, the Board may obtain with respect to the applicant a Vermont criminal history record, an out-of-state criminal history record, and a criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Federal Bureau of Investigation background checks shall be fingerprint-supported, and fingerprints so obtained may be retained on file and used to notify the Board of future triggering events. Each applicant shall consent to the release of criminal history records to the Board on forms developed by the Vermont Crime Information Center.

An applicant or licensee shall bear any cost of obtaining a required criminal history background check.

The Board shall comply with all laws regulating the release of criminal history records and the protection of individual privacy.

No person shall confirm the existence or nonexistence of criminal history record information to any person who would not be eligible to receive the information pursuant to this chapter. As used in this subdivision, “criminal history record” has the same meaning as in

20 V.S.A. § 2056a

.

Inquire, at the Board’s discretion, of the Vermont Department for Children and Families or of the Vermont Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living to determine whether any applicant, licensee, or holder of certification who may provide care or treatment to a child or a vulnerable adult is listed on the Child Protection Registry or the vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, and exploitation registry.

As part of the license application or renewal process, collect data necessary to allow for workforce strategic planning required under 18 V.S.A. chapter 222.

During a declared state of emergency:

The Board or the Executive Director of the Board may issue a temporary license to an individual who is currently licensed to practice as a physician, physician assistant, or podiatrist in another jurisdiction, whose license is in good standing, and who is not subject to disciplinary proceedings in any other jurisdiction. The temporary license shall authorize the holder to practice in Vermont until the termination of the declared state of emergency or 90 days, whichever occurs first, provided the licensee remains in good standing, and may be reissued by the Board if the declared state of emergency continues longer than 90 days. Fees shall be waived when a license is required to provide services under this subdivision (A).

The Board or the Executive Director of the Board may waive supervision and scope of practice requirements for physician assistants, including the requirement for documentation of the relationship between a physician assistant and a physician pursuant to section 1735a of this title. The Board or Executive Director may impose limitations or conditions when granting a waiver under this subdivision (B).

Provide a pre-application determination of an individual’s criminal background. This determination shall not be binding on the Board in a future application if the individual violates probation or parole or is convicted of another crime following the determination.

The Board shall initiate this determination upon an individual’s “second chance” determination request. This request shall provide documentation related to the individual’s conviction or convictions, evidence of rehabilitation, and identification of the profession or professions for which the individual seeks licensure.

The individual shall submit this request online, accompanied by the fee for pre-application determinations set forth in section 1401a of this chapter. If the individual thereafter applies for licensure, this pre-application fee shall be deducted from that license application fee.

The Board shall:

process a request within 30 days of receiving a complete request;

assess the nature of the underlying conviction or convictions, the nexus to the profession or professions for which the individual seeks licensure, and the provided evidence of rehabilitation; and

respond to the individual’s request in writing.

whose spouse is a member of the U.S. Armed Forces and who has been subject to a military transfer to Vermont; and

who left employment to accompany his or her spouse to Vermont.

Establish uniform procedures applicable to all of the professions under its jurisdiction, providing for:
(13) (A) Establish uniform procedures applicable to all of the professions under its jurisdiction, providing for:

The Board may evaluate specific military credentials to determine equivalency to credentials within the Board’s jurisdiction. The determinations shall be adopted through written policy that shall be posted on the Board’s website.

(i)

appropriate recognition of education, training, or service completed by a member of the U.S. Armed Forces toward the requirements of professional licensure;

(ii)

expedited issuance of a professional license to a person who is licensed in good standing in another regulatory jurisdiction:

Adopt rules that prescribe a process for the Board to assess the equivalence of an applicant’s professional credentials earned outside the United States as compared to State licensing requirements for those professions within the Board’s jurisdiction.
(14) (A) Adopt rules that prescribe a process for the Board to assess the equivalence of an applicant’s professional credentials earned outside the United States as compared to State licensing requirements for those professions within the Board’s jurisdiction.

Any determination of equivalence by the Board under this subdivision (14) shall be recorded in the applicant’s licensing file.

In administering this section, the Board may rely upon third-party credential verification services. The cost of such services shall be paid by the applicant.

Not less than once every five years, review the continuing education and other continuing competency requirements for each of the professions it regulates. The review results shall be in writing and address the following:
(15) (A) Not less than once every five years, review the continuing education and other continuing competency requirements for each of the professions it regulates. The review results shall be in writing and address the following:

the renewal requirements of the profession;

the renewal requirements in other jurisdictions, particularly in the Northeast region;

the cost of the renewal requirements for the profession’s licensees;

an analysis of the utility and effectiveness of the renewal requirements with respect to public protection; and

recommendations to the Commissioner of Health on whether the continuing education or other continuing competency requirements should be modified.

The Commissioner of Health shall respond to the Board within 45 days of its submitted review results. The Commissioner may require the Board to reduce, modify, or otherwise change the renewal requirements, including by proposing any necessary amendments to statute or rule.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 38; 1991 No. 167 (Adj. Sess.), § 30;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 24, 25, eff. Feb. 16, 1994;

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 8, 9;

1999, No. 14

, § 2;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 34

, § 8, eff. May 23, 2003;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2013, No. 79

, § 43, eff. June 7, 2013;

2013, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. March 30, 2020;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 1354.
Unprofessional conduct.

The Board shall find that any one of the following, or any combination of the following, whether the conduct at issue was committed within or outside the State, constitutes unprofessional conduct:

fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring a medical license or in connection with applying for or procuring periodic renewal of a medical license;

all advertising of medical business that is intended or has a tendency to deceive the public or impose upon credulous or ignorant persons and so be harmful or injurious to public morals or safety;

[Repealed.]

abandonment of a patient;

habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that impair the licensee’s ability to practice medicine;

promotion by a physician of the sale of drugs, devices, appliances, or goods provided for a patient in such a manner as to exploit the patient for financial gain of the physician or selling, prescribing, giving away, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes;

conduct that evidences unfitness to practice medicine;

willfully making and filing false reports or records in his or her practice as a physician;

willful omission to file or record, or willfully impeding or obstructing a filing or recording, or inducing another person to omit to file or record medical reports required by law;

failure to make available promptly to a person using professional health care services, that person’s representative, succeeding health care professionals, or institutions, when given proper written request and direction of the person using professional health care services, copies of that person’s records in the possession or under the control of the licensed practitioner;

solicitation of professional patronage by agents or persons or profiting from the acts of those representing themselves to be agents of the licensed physician;

division of fees or agreeing to split or divide the fees received for professional services for any person for bringing to or referring a patient;

agreeing with clinical or bio-analytical laboratories to make payments to such laboratories for individual tests or test series for patients, unless the physician discloses on the bills to patients or third party payors the name of such laboratory, the amount or amounts to such laboratory for individual tests or test series, and the amount of his or her processing charge or procurement, if any, for each specimen taken;

willful misrepresentation in treatments;

practicing medicine with a physician who is not legally practicing within the State, or aiding or abetting such physician in the practice of medicine; except that it shall be legal to practice in an accredited preceptorship or residency training program or pursuant to section 1313 of this title;

gross overcharging for professional services on repeated occasions, including filing of false statements for collection of fees for which services are not rendered;

offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine;

consistent improper utilization of services;

consistent use of nonaccepted procedures that have a consistent detrimental effect upon patients;

professional incompetency resulting from physical or mental impairment;

permitting one’s name or license to be used by a person, group, or corporation when not actually in charge of or responsible for the treatment given;

in the course of practice, gross failure to use and exercise on a particular occasion or the failure to use and exercise on repeated occasions, that degree of care, skill, and proficiency that is commonly exercised by the ordinary skillful, careful, and prudent physician engaged in similar practice under the same or similar conditions, whether or not actual injury to a patient has occurred;

revocation of a license to practice medicine or surgery, or other disciplinary sanction, by another jurisdiction on one or more of the grounds specified in this section;

failure to comply with the provisions of

18 V.S.A. § 1852

;

failure to comply with an order of the Board or violation of any term or condition of a license that is restricted or conditioned by the Board;

any physician who, in the course of a collaborative agreement with a nurse practitioner allows the nurse practitioner to perform a medical act that is outside the usual scope of the physician’s own practice or that the nurse practitioner is not qualified to perform by training or experience, or that the ordinary reasonable and prudent physician engaged in a similar practice would not agree should be written into the scope of the nurse practitioner’s practice;

failure to comply with provisions of federal statutes or regulations, or the statutes or rules of this or any other state, governing the practice of medicine or surgery;

practice of profession when medically or psychologically unfit to do so;

delegation of professional responsibilities to a person whom the licensed professional knows, or has reason to know, is not qualified by training, experience, education, or licensing credentials to perform them;

conviction of a crime related to the practice of the profession or conviction of a felony, whether or not related to the practice of the profession, or failure to report to the Board a conviction of any crime related to the practice of the profession or any felony in any court within 30 days of the conviction;

use of the services of an anesthesiologist assistant by an anesthesiologist in a manner that is inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 29 of this title;

use of the services of a radiologist assistant by a radiologist in a manner that is inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 52 of this title;

providing, prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing medical services or prescription medication or prescription-only devices to a person in response to any communication transmitted or received by computer or other electronic means, when the licensee fails to take the following actions to establish and maintain a proper physician-patient relationship:
(33) (A) providing, prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing medical services or prescription medication or prescription-only devices to a person in response to any communication transmitted or received by computer or other electronic means, when the licensee fails to take the following actions to establish and maintain a proper physician-patient relationship:

a reasonable effort to verify that the person requesting medication is in fact the patient, and is in fact who the person claims to be;

establishment of documented diagnosis through the use of accepted medical practices; and

maintenance of a current medical record;

for the purposes of this subdivision (33), an electronic, on-line, or telephonic evaluation by questionnaire is inadequate for the initial evaluation of the patient;

the following would not be in violation of this subdivision (33) if transmitted or received by computer or other electronic means:

initial admission orders for newly hospitalized patients;

prescribing for a patient of another physician for whom the prescriber has taken the call;

prescribing for a patient examined by a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, or other advanced practitioner authorized by law and supported by the physician;

continuing medication on a short-term basis for a new patient, prior to the patient’s first appointment; or

emergency situations where life or health of the patient is in imminent danger;

failure to provide to the Board such information it may reasonably request in furtherance of its statutory duties. The patient privilege set forth in

12 V.S.A. § 1612

shall not bar the licensee’s obligations under this subsection (a) and no confidentiality agreement entered into in concluding a settlement of a malpractice claim shall exempt the licensee from fulfilling his or her obligations under this subdivision;

disruptive behavior that involves interaction with physicians, hospital personnel, office staff, patients, or support persons of the patient or others that interferes with patient care or could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the quality of care rendered to a patient;

commission of any sexual misconduct that exploits the physician-patient relationship, including sexual contact with a patient, surrogates, or key third parties;

prescribing, selling, administering, distributing, ordering, or dispensing any drug legally classified as a controlled substance for the licensee’s own use or to an immediate family member as defined by rule;

signing a blank or undated prescription form;

[Repealed.]

use of conversion therapy as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 8351

on a client younger than 18 years of age; or

failure to comply with one or more of the notice, disclosure, or advertising requirements in

18 V.S.A. § 4502

for administering stem cell or stem cell-related products not approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

The Board may also find that failure to practice competently by reason of any cause on a single occasion or on multiple occasions constitutes unprofessional conduct. Failure to practice competently includes, as determined by the Board:

performance of unsafe or unacceptable patient care; or

failure to conform to the essential standards of acceptable and prevailing practice.

The burden of proof in a disciplinary action shall be on the State to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has engaged in unprofessional conduct.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 307

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 22, 1968;

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1985, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

1993, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 11, 1994;

1993, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 13, 2002;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 19a, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 34

, § 3, eff. May 23, 2003;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 19c, eff. May 12, 2010;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2015, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 74

, § 117;

2019, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 61

, § 3.

Particular cases.

Any finding of unprofessional conduct would necessarily have been based upon the conduct of a physician assistant (PA) alone because the Board of Medical Practice found that the physician himself did not fail to meet the standards of care, and in one case exceeded that required by the Board. Because the statute governing unprofessional conduct did not include a basis for disciplining a physician based solely upon the acts of a PA, the Board quite simply would not have had the authority to sanction the physician for the PA’s acts under that statute. In re Porter, 2012 VT 97, 192 Vt. 601, 70 A.3d 915, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 92 (2012).

In a license suspension proceeding, the record did not support a physician’s claim that the Medical Practice Board’s findings of unprofessional conduct were based on surmise or were insufficiently tethered to the evidence. The Board found that the evidence suggested that the physician’s initial examination and his continuing oversight of his patients was superficial at best and not up to the strict professional standards required by the Policy for the Use of Controlled Substances for the Treatment of Pain for physicians prescribing narcotics; the Board also cited specific evidence in finding that the physician had failed to adequately discuss the risks of controlled substances with his patients or evaluate behaviors indicating the possibility of drug dependence or diversion, that he had prescribed narcotics in greater amounts than the actual dosages required, and that his testimony at the post-suspension evidentiary hearing failed to provide the missing rationale or adequate explanation of his treatment and prescribing practices. In re Miller, 2009 VT 112, 186 Vt. 505, 989 A.2d 982, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 124 (2009).

Court defers to determinations that require the Medical Practice Board to apply its expertise or weigh whether certain behavior violated the standard of care pertaining to professional conduct, and it would not, therefore, second-guess the Board’s conclusion that a physician’s actions in prescribing narcotics in excessive quantity without an adequate rationale or concern for the risks of drug dependence and diversion violated the standards of professional conduct. Nor was expert testimony required for a board composed in substantial part of a licensee’s peers. In re Miller, 2009 VT 112, 186 Vt. 505, 989 A.2d 982, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 124 (2009).

Cited.

Cited in

Board of Medical Practice v. Perry-Hooker, 143 Vt. 268, 465 A.2d 291, 1983 Vt. LEXIS 505 (1983); Nash v. Wennar, 645 F. Supp. 238, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19107 (D. Vt. 1986); LoPresti v. Rutland Regional Health Services, 2004 VT 105, 177 Vt. 316, 865 A.2d 1102, 2004 Vt. LEXIS 311 (2004).

§§ 1355-1361.
Repealed. 2019, No. 126 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1362.
Repealed.
1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 1363.
Repealed. 1991, No. 167 (Adj. Sess.), § 66(7).

§ 1364.
References to the State Board of Medical Registration.

The State Board of Medical Registration is abolished.
All references in the Vermont Statutes Annotated to the State Board of Medical Registration shall be deemed from and after July 1, 1976, to refer to the State Board of Medical Practice.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1365.
Notice of conviction of crime; interim suspension of license.

The Board shall treat a notice of conviction of a crime for which a licensee may be disciplined under section 1354 of this title as an unprofessional conduct complaint. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of the judgment of conviction of a crime for which a licensee may be disciplined for unprofessional conduct, the Board may immediately suspend that person’s license until the time for appeal has elapsed and no appeal has been taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the Board. The Board shall notify the licensee whose license has been suspended under this section and advise the licensee of his or her right to request a hearing, within 90 days. At such hearing, the licensee shall have the burden of showing why the suspension should not remain in effect pending appeal.

The disciplinary hearing shall not be commenced until all appeals from the conviction are concluded unless the licensee requests that the matter not be deferred. The sole issue to be determined at such hearing shall be the nature of the disciplinary action to be taken by the Board.

An interim suspension ordered under subsection (b) of this section shall automatically terminate if the licensee demonstrates that the conviction that served as the basis of the interim suspension has been reversed or vacated. However, a reversal or vacated conviction shall not prohibit the Board from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1366.
Out-of-state discipline; interim suspension of license.

The Board shall treat a certified copy of an order revoking or suspending the license of a person licensed to practice medicine or surgery in another jurisdiction on grounds for which a licensee may be disciplined under subdivision 1354(a)(23) of this title as an unprofessional conduct complaint. A certified copy of the order of revocation or suspension shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the revocation or suspension occurred.

The Board shall treat as an unprofessional conduct complaint any notice of a statement of a licensing entity in another jurisdiction that verifies that a person licensed to practice medicine or surgery in that jurisdiction failed to renew, surrendered, or otherwise terminated his or her license during, or prior to initiation of, proceedings to revoke or suspend his or her license. A certified copy of the statement shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that such termination occurred.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of an order or statement referred to in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the Board shall follow the procedures for interim suspension set forth in subsection 1365(b) of this chapter.

The sole issue to be determined at the disciplinary hearing on a complaint filed under subsection (a) of this section shall be the nature of the disciplinary action to be taken by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1367.
Appeals from Board orders.

A party aggrieved by a final order of the Board may, within 30 days of the order, appeal that order to the Vermont Supreme Court on the basis of the record created before the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 13, 2002.